parSem/xip/dev/GRAMMARS/PORTUGUESE/FST2/src/lex-countries.lexc
!# ============================================================================
!# TYPE:	lexc
!# ENCODING:	UTF-8	[€äàáâ]
!# CONTENT:     continent and country names	
!#
!# LANGUAGE:    PORTUGUESE
!#
!# CREATED:	12-Aug-2008
!#
!# ============================================================================
!# sources:
!# OLD/tmp.countries
!# OLD/tmp.continents
!# ADD/lexLocation.xip
!#
!# MARKERS 
!# !! = in both sources
!# !* = from old FSTs
!# ============================================================================

Multichar_Symbols

+Noun +Prop +Adj 

+Continent
+Country

+Sg +Pl +SP
+Masc +Fem +MF

+Acron +Abbr


! special markers
(.)	! optional dot
(-)	! optional hyphen
[-]	! hyphen or space

^]	! lemma boundary (for inflecting proper names)



!# ------------------------------------------------------------------------
!# Continuation classes

LEXICON	MSG	+Masc+Sg	#;
LEXICON	FSG	+Fem+Sg		#;
LEXICON	MPL	+Masc+Pl	#;
LEXICON	FPL	+Fem+Pl		#;

LEXICON MSGPL	MSG; MPL;
LEXICON FSGPL	FSG; FPL;

LEXICON MFSGPL	MSGPL; FSGPL;

!# plural = singular
LEXICON MSP	+Masc+SP	#;
LEXICON FSP	+Fem+SP		#;
LEXICON MFSP	MSP; FSP;

!# masc = fem
LEXICON XSG	+MF+Sg		#;
LEXICON XPL	+MF+Pl		#;
LEXICON XSGPL	XSG; XPL;

!# masc = fem; plural = singular
LEXICON XSP	+MF+SP		#;

!# =============================================================================
!# MAIN LEXICON
!# =============================================================================

LEXICON ROOT 

!//==============================================================================
!// Continents
!//==============================================================================

África+Prop+Continent			FSG;	!*
América+Prop+Continent			FSG;	!*
Antárctida+Prop+Continent		FSG;
Ásia+Prop+Continent			FSG;	!*
Australásia+Prop+Continent		FSG;	!?
Europa+Prop+Continent			FSG;	!*
Oceânia+Prop+Continent			FSG;	!*

!//==============================================================================
!// Countries
!//==============================================================================

Afeganistão+Prop+Country		MSG;	!!
África% do% Sul+Prop+Country		FSG;	!!
Albânia+Prop+Country			FSG;	!!
Alemanha% Federal+Prop+Country		FSG;	!*
Alemanha% Ocidental+Prop+Country	FSG;	!*
Alemanha% Oriental+Prop+Country		FSG;	!*
Alemanha+Prop+Country			FSG;	!!
Andorra+Prop+Country			FSG;	!!
Angola+Prop+Country			FSG;	!!
Antígua% e% Barbuda+Prop+Country	XSG;
Arábia+Prop+Country			FSG;	!*
Arábia% Saudita+Prop+Country		FSG;	!!
Argélia+Prop+Country			FSG;	!!
Argentina+Prop+Country			FSG;	!!
Arménia+Prop+Country			FSG;	!!
Armênia+Prop+Country			FSG;	!!
Austrália+Prop+Country			FSG;	!!
Áustria+Prop+Country			FSG;	!!
Azerbaijão+Prop+Country			XSG;
Baamas+Prop+Country			FPL;	!!
Bahamas+Prop+Country			FPL;
Baharem+Prop+Country			XSG;
Bahrein+Prop+Country			MSG;	!!
Bangladeche+Prop+Country		MSG;
Bangladesh+Prop+Country			MSG;
Banglades+Prop+Country			XSG;
Barbados+Prop+Country			FSG;	!!
Barém+Prop+Country			XSG;
Bélgica+Prop+Country			FSG;	!!
Belize+Prop+Country			MSG;	!!
Benim+Prop+Country			MSG;
Benin+Prop+Country			MSG;	!*
Bielorrússia+Prop+Country		FSG;
Bielo-Rússia+Prop+Country		FSG;	!*
Birmânia+Prop+Country			FSG;	!!
Bolívia+Prop+Country			FSG;	!!
Bornéu+Prop+Country			MSG;	!*
Bósnia% e% Herzegovina+Prop+Country	FSG;
Bósnia-Herzegovina+Prop+Country		FSG;	!*
Bósnia+Prop+Country			FSG;	!!
Botsuana+Prop+Country			MSG;
Botswana+Prop+Country			MSG;	!!
Brasil+Prop+Country			MSG;	!!
Brunei+Prop+Country			XSG;
Bulgária+Prop+Country			FSG;	!!
Burquina% Faso+Prop+Country		XSG;
Burundi+Prop+Country			MSG;	!!
Butão+Prop+Country			XSG;
Cabo% Verde+Prop+Country		MSG;	!!
Camarões+Prop+Country			XSG;
Camboja+Prop+Country			MSG;	!!
Campuchéia+Prop+Country			MSG;	!*
Canadá+Prop+Country			MSG;	!!
Catar+Prop+Country			XSG;
Cazaquistão+Prop+Country		XSG;
Ceilão+Prop+Country			MSG;	!*
Chade+Prop+Country			XSG;
Checoslováquia+Prop+Country		FSG;	!!
Chile+Prop+Country			MSG;	!!
China+Prop+Country			FSG;	!!
Chipre+Prop+Country			MSG;	!!
Cingapura+Prop+Country			XSG;
Colômbia+Prop+Country			FSG;	!!
Comores+Prop+Country			FPL;	!!
Congo-Brazzaville+Prop+Country		XSG;
Congo-Kinshasa+Prop+Country		XSG;
Congo+Prop+Country			MSG;	!!
Coréia% do% Norte+Prop+Country		FSG;	!!
Coréia% do% Sul+Prop+Country		FSG;	!!
Coréia+Prop+Country			FSG;	!!
Costa% do% Marfim+Prop+Country		FSG;	!!
Costa% Rica+Prop+Country		FSG;	!!
Croácia+Prop+Country			FSG;	!!
Cuba+Prop+Country			FSG;	!!
Dinamarca+Prop+Country			FSG;	!!
Egipto+Prop+Country			MSG;	!!
Egito+Prop+Country			MSG;	!!
Emirados% Árabes+Prop+Country		XSG;
Equador+Prop+Country			MSG;	!!
Eritreia+Prop+Country			XSG;
Eritréia+Prop+Country			XSG;
Escócia+Prop+Country			FSG;	!*
Eslováquia+Prop+Country			FSG;	!!
Eslovénia+Prop+Country			XSG;
Eslovênia+Prop+Country			XSG;
Espanha+Prop+Country			FSG;	!!
Estados% Unidos% de% América+Prop+Country	MPL;	!!
Estados% Unidos+Prop+Country		MPL;	!!
Estónia+Prop+Country			FSG;	!!
Estônia+Prop+Country			FSG;	!*
Etiópia+Prop+Country			FSG;	!!
Etíopia+Prop+Country			XSG;
EUA+Prop+Country+Acron			MPL;
Eua+Prop+Country			MPL;	!*
Fiji+Prop+Country			XSG;
Filipinas+Prop+Country			FPL;	!!
Finlândia+Prop+Country			FSG;	!!
França+Prop+Country			FSG;	!!
Gabão+Prop+Country			MSG;	!!
Gâmbia+Prop+Country			FSG;	!!
Gana+Prop+Country			XSG;
Geórgia+Prop+Country			FSG;	!!
Grã-Bretanha+Prop+Country		FSG;	!*
Granada+Prop+Country			FSG;	!!
Grécia+Prop+Country			FSG;	!!
Gronenlândia+Prop+Country		FSG;	!*
Guatemala+Prop+Country			FSG;	!!
Guiana+Prop+Country			FSG;	!!
Güiana+Prop+Country			XSG;
Guiné-Bissau+Prop+Country		FSG;	!!
Guiné% Equatorial+Prop+Country		XSG;
Guiné+Prop+Country			FSG;	!!
Haiti+Prop+Country			MSG;	!!
Holanda+Prop+Country			FSG;	!!
Honduras+Prop+Country			MSG;	!!
Hungria+Prop+Country			FSG;	!!
Iémen+Prop+Country			XSG;
Índia+Prop+Country			FSG;	!!
Indonésia+Prop+Country			FSG;	!!
Inglaterra+Prop+Country			FSG;	!*
Irão+Prop+Country			XSG;
Irã+Prop+Country			MSG;	!!
Iraque+Prop+Country			MSG;	!!
Irlanda+Prop+Country			FSG;	!!
Islândia+Prop+Country			FSG;	!!
Israel+Prop+Country			MSG;	!!
Itália+Prop+Country			FSG;	!!
Jamaica+Prop+Country			FSG;	!!
Japão+Prop+Country			MSG;	!!
Jordânia+Prop+Country			FSG;	!!
Jugoslávia+Prop+Country			FSG;	!*
Kiribati+Prop+Country			XSG;
Koweit+Prop+Country			XSG;
Kuwait+Prop+Country			XSG;
Laos+Prop+Country			XSG;
Lesoto+Prop+Country			XSG;
Letónia+Prop+Country			FSG;	!!
Letônia+Prop+Country			FSG;	!*
Líbano+Prop+Country			MSG;	!!
Libéria+Prop+Country			FSG;	!!
Líbia+Prop+Country			FSG;	!!
Liechtenstein+Prop+Country		XSG;
Listenstaine+Prop+Country		XSG;
Lituânia+Prop+Country			FSG;	!!
Luxemburgo+Prop+Country			MSG;	!!
Macedónia+Prop+Country			XSG;
Madagáscar+Prop+Country			XSG;
Malásia+Prop+Country			FSG;	!!
Malavi+Prop+Country			XSG;
Malawi+Prop+Country			XSG;
Maldivas+Prop+Country			FPL;	!!
Mali+Prop+Country			MSG;	!!
Malta+Prop+Country			FSG;	!!
Marrocos+Prop+Country			MSG;	!*
Maurícia+Prop+Country			XSG;
Maurícias+Prop+Country			XSG;
Maurício+Prop+Country			MSG;	!*
Mauritânia+Prop+Country			FSG;	!!
México+Prop+Country			MSG;	!!
Mianmar+Prop+Country			XSG;
Micronésia+Prop+Country			XSG;
Moçambique+Prop+Country			MSG;	!!
Moldávia+Prop+Country			XSG;
Mónaco+Prop+Country			XSG;
Mongólia+Prop+Country			XSG;
Montenegro+Prop+Country			XSG;
Myanmar+Prop+Country			XSG;
Namíbia+Prop+Country			FSG;	!!
Nauru+Prop+Country			XSG;
Neerlândia+Prop+Country			FSG;	!*
Nepal+Prop+Country			XSG;
Nicarágua+Prop+Country			FSG;	!!
Nigéria+Prop+Country			FSG;	!!
Níger+Prop+Country			MSG;	!!
Noruega+Prop+Country			FSG;	!!
Nova% Zelândia+Prop+Country		FSG;	!!
Omã+Prop+Country			XSG;
Países% Baixos+Prop+Country		MPL;	!*
Países-Baixos+Prop+Country		XSG;
Palau+Prop+Country			XSG;
Palestina+Prop+Country			XSG;
Panamá+Prop+Country			MSG;	!!
Papua-Nova-Guiné+Prop+Country		XSG;
Paquistão+Prop+Country			MSG;	!!
Paraguai+Prop+Country			MSG;	!!
Perú+Prop+Country			MSG;	!*
Peru+Prop+Country			XSG;
Polónia+Prop+Country			FSG;	!!
Polônia+Prop+Country			FSG;	!!
Porto% Rico+Prop+Country		XSG;
Portugal+Prop+Country			MSG;	!!
Qatar+Prop+Country			XSG;
Quénia+Prop+Country			MSG;	!!
Quênia+Prop+Country			MSG;	!*
Quirguistão+Prop+Country		XSG;
Quiribati+Prop+Country			XSG;
Reino% Unido+Prop+Country		MSG;	!!
República% Centro-Africana+Prop+Country	FSG;	!!
República% Checa+Prop+Country		FSG;
República% de% Trinidad% e% Tobago+Prop+Country	FSG;	!*
República% do% Chade+Prop+Country	FSG;	!*
República% do% Malauí+Prop+Country	FSG;	!*
República% Dominicana+Prop+Country	FSG;	!!
República% dos% Camarões+Prop+Country	FSG;	!*
República% Malagaxe+Prop+Country	FSG;	!*
Roménia+Prop+Country			FSG;	!!
Romênia+Prop+Country			FSG;	!!
Ruanda+Prop+Country			XSG;
Rússia% Branca+Prop+Country		FSG;	!*
Rússia+Prop+Country			FSG;	!!
Salvador+Prop+Country			MSG;	!!
Samoa+Prop+Country			XSG;
Santa% Lúcia+Prop+Country		XSG;
São% Domingos+Prop+Country		MSG;	!*
São% Marinho+Prop+Country		MSG;	!!
San% Marino+Prop+Country		MSG;	!!
S.% Marino+Prop+Country		MSG;	!!
São% Tomé% e% Príncipe+Prop+Country	MSG;	!!
Senegal+Prop+Country			MSG;	!!
Serra% Leoa+Prop+Country		XSG;
Sérvia+Prop+Country			XSG;
Seycheles+Prop+Country			XSG;
Singapura+Prop+Country			FSG;	!!
Síria+Prop+Country			FSG;	!!
Somália+Prop+Country			FSG;	!!
Sri% Lanca+Prop+Country			MSG;
Sri-Lanka+Prop+Country			MSG;	!*
S.% Tomé% e% Príncipe+Prop+Country	MSG;	!*
Suazilândia+Prop+Country		FSG;	!!
Sudão+Prop+Country			MSG;	!!
Suécia+Prop+Country			FSG;	!!
Suíça+Prop+Country			FSG;	!!
Suriname+Prop+Country			XSG;
Tailândia+Prop+Country			FSG;	!!
Taiwan+Prop+Country			XSG;
Tajiquistão+Prop+Country		XSG;
Tanzânia+Prop+Country			FSG;	!!
Tchecoslováquia+Prop+Country		FSG;	!*
Tchéquia+Prop+Country			XSG;
Timor-Leste+Prop+Country		XSG;
Togo+Prop+Country			XSG;
Tonga+Prop+Country			XSG;
Trinidade% e% Tobago+Prop+Country	XSG;
Tunísia+Prop+Country			XSG;
Turqueministão+Prop+Country		XSG;
Turquia+Prop+Country			FSG;	!!
Tuvalu+Prop+Country			XSG;
Ucrânia+Prop+Country			XSG;
Uganda+Prop+Country			MSG;	!!
Ulster+Prop+Country			MSG;	!!
União% Soviética+Prop+Country		FSG;	!!
URSS+Prop+Country+Acron			XSG;
Urss+Prop+Country			FSG;	!*
URSS+Prop+Country			FSG;	!*
Uruguai+Prop+Country			MSG;	!!
USA+Prop+Country+Acron			MPL;	!!
Usa+Prop+Country			MPL;	!*
Usbequistão+Prop+Country		XSG;
Uzbequistão+Prop+Country		XSG;
Vanuatu+Prop+Country			XSG;
Vaticano+Prop+Country			MSG;	!!
Venezuela+Prop+Country			FSG;	!!
Vietname+Prop+Country			XSG;
Vietnã+Prop+Country			MSG;	!*
Zaire+Prop+Country			MSG;	!*
Zâmbia+Prop+Country			FSG;	!!
Zimbábue+Prop+Country			MSG;	!*
Zimbabué+Prop+Country			MSG;
Zimbabwe+Prop+Country			MSG;	!!
